New Jersey, session 221, A4031.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.31 (C.2C:40A-6) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  A person, including, but not limited to, a health care provider, health care facility, non-profit organization, and recovery residence, is guilty of a crime of the [fourth] third degree if the person makes or receives a payment or otherwise furnishes or receives any fee, commission, or rebate to any person in connection with the referral of patients to a facility licensed in accordance with section 8 of P.L.1975, c.305 (C.26:2B-14) for substance use disorder treatment or services or to a substance use disorder treatment facility issued a certificate of approval pursuant to P.L.1970, c.334 (C.26:2G-21 et seq.).  Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a person convicted of an offense under this subsection shall be sentenced to make restitution and to pay a fine of $50,000. b.    A person is guilty of a crime of the [fourth] third degree if the person knowingly assists, conspires with, or urges any person to make, furnish, or receive a payment, fee, commission, or rebate in violation of subsection a. of this section.  Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a person convicted of an offense under this subsection shall be sentenced to make restitution and to pay a fine of $50,000. c.     It shall not be a violation of subsection a. of this section to make or receive a payment or otherwise furnish or receive any fee, commission, or rebate that does not vary based on: (1)   the number of patients referred to a substance use disorder treatment facility; (2)   the duration, level, volume, or nature of the substance use disorder treatment services provided to a patient; or (3)   the amount of benefits provided by a carrier to a substance use disorder treatment facility for treatment or services provided to a patient. d.  As used in this section: "Health care facility" means a health care facility licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). "Health care provider" means an individual who provides a health care service to a patient acting within the scope of a valid license or certification issued pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes. Recovery residence means housing with a home-like atmosphere, which is available in either a professionally-managed facility or a peer-managed facility, and which provides a sober living environment and alcohol- and drug-free living accommodations to individuals with substance use disorders, or to individuals with co-occurring mental health and substance use disorders, but which does not provide clinical treatment services for mental health or substance use disorders.  Recovery residence includes, but is not limited to, a facility that is commonly referred to as a sober living home. (cf:  P.L.2021, c.31, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect on the 30th day after the date of enactment.